Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-1701 to 86-1705 shall be known and may be cited as the Parental Rights in Social Media Act.

Laws 2025, LB383, § 26.
July 1, 2026